apertium-kaz-kir.kaz.lexc
LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYSI

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:қайсы CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:қайсының CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:қайсыған CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:қайсыны CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:қайсыдан CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:қайсыда CLIT ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<ins%>:қайсымен CLIT ;

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px%>:қайсынікі%{n%} CASE ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>:қайсы GER-POSS-REAL ; ! қайсысы, қайсыбыз, қайсығыз

қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>:қайсылар GER-CASE-ETC ;
қайсы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:қайсылары%{n%} GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
! ^ кайсылары(б/г)ыз are rare but possible in Tatar, so maybe these forms should
! be included too /IS/

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANSHA

! Might be not complete (қаншалар?)
! Currently қанша<prn><itg> is translated with ничә<num><itg><subst> and
! қанша<adv><itg> is going to be translated with "күпме" or "никадәр"

қанша%<prn%>%<itg%>:қанша CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QANDAY

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:қандай CLIT ;
! ^ FIXME Similative form of demonstrative pronouns should receive an alternati-
! ve continuation with CLIT too. Consider e,g.: "Ең жақсы Интернет қандай?" Here
! it shouldn't receive <nom> tag I think /IS/
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:қандай CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:қандайы%{n%} CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:қандайлар CASE ;
қандай%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:қандайлары%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

PRON-ITG-QAYSI ;
PRON-ITG-QANSHA ;
PRON-ITG-QANDAY ;
нәрсе:нәрсе PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "thing" ! Use/MT
не:не PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
кім:кім PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-IND-POSS

%<prn%>%<ind%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASE-ETC ;
%<adv%>:ше CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<frm%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

! This is how it was before:
!%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSS-REAL ;
!%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%{L%}%{A%}р POSS-REAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     OTHER PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSS-REAL ;     ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы", which should have a <px3sp> analysis

LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON N5
! This is only really needed for Russian noun stems where the last vowel is и or у.

:%{☭%} N1 ;


!LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
!N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
!:%>ш%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

!%<adj%>%<top%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} ADJ-COMMON ;  ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M
 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./
 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I     ! Used only for бері<adv>/бергі<adv><attr> right now

:і ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

LEXICON ADVITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD-ASS

%<mod_ass%>: # ;

LEXICON MOD

! шығар, сияқты etc.

%<mod%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON IDEO

%<ideo%>: # ;

 LEXICON Conjunctions
да:де CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
сондай%-ақ:сондай%-ақ CC ; ! ""
уа:уа CC ; ! "and"
біресе:біресе CC ; ! "то ... , то ... (x2)"
егерде:егерде CS ; ! "if"
онда:онда CS ; ! "then"
себебі:себебі CS ; ! "because"    ! FIXME:NOTE: disambig from "себеп.n.px3sg"
мүбада:мүбада CS ; ! "if"
басқаша% айтканда:басқаша% айтканда CA ; ! ""
осы% себептен:осы% себептен CA ; ! "therefore"
сондықтан:сондықтан CA ; ! "that is why"
сөйтсе:сөйтсе CA ; ! "nevertheless"
ойынша:ойынша CA ; ! ""
 LEXICON Postpositions
қарамағында:қарамағында POST ; ! "" FIXME CHECK
секілді:секілді POST ; ! "like, как будто" + NOM
дейін:дейін POST ; ! "until, up to, as far as" + DAT
құрлы:құрлы POST ; ! "like, similar to = ғұрлы" + DAT
бойда:бойда POST ;
 LEXICON Numerals
төрт:төрт NUM ; ! "four"
сегіз:сегіз NUM ; ! "eight"
он% алты:он% алты NUM ; ! "sixteen"
жиырма:жиырма NUM-TWENTY ; ! "twenty"
жетпіс:жетпіс NUM ; ! "seventy"
триллион:триллион NUM ; ! "trillion"
екі:екеу NUM-COLL ;
үш:үшеу NUM-COLL ;
төрт:төртеу NUM-COLL ;
бес:бесеу NUM-COLL ;
жеті:жетеу NUM-COLL ;
V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
неше:неше NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON Nouns
авторлық:авторлық N3 ; ! ""
Аллаһ:Аллаһ N3 ; ! ""
ауа% райы:ауа% рай N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "weather,climate"
бауыр:бауыр N1 ; ! "younger brother,liver"
Будда:Будда N3 ; ! ""
ешкі:ешкі N1 ; ! "goat"
институт:институт N5 ; ! ""
қазіргі% заман:қазіргі% заман N3 ; ! "" Use/MT
қатар:қатар N1 ; ! "file,row"
меморандум:меморандум N5 ; ! ""
отбасы:отбас N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "family"
панк:панк N5 ; ! ""
рентген:рентген N1 ; ! ""
руль:руль N5 ; ! "steering wheel"
шарт:шарт N1 ; ! "condition requirement"
штаб:штаб N5 ; ! ""
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Омбы:Омбы NP-TOP ; ! ""
Душанбе:Душанбе NP-TOP ; ! ""
Стокгольм:Стокгольм NP-TOP ; ! "" 
Венесуэла:Венесуэла NP-TOP ; ! ""
Сауд% Арабиясы:Сауд% Арабия N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
Тайланд:Тайланд NP-TOP ; ! ""
Әділбай:Әділбай NP-ANT-M; ! "Ädilbay" (Arabic)
Әсем:Әсем NP-ANT-F; ! "Äsem" (Kazakh)
Бексейіт:Бексейіт NP-ANT-M; ! "Bekseyit" (Arabic)
Ділда:Ділда NP-ANT-F; ! "Dilda" (Arabic)
Жолан:Жолан NP-ANT-M; ! "Jolan" (Kazakh)
Қызғалдақ:Қызғалдақ NP-ANT-F; ! "Qızğaldaq" (Kazakh)
Нағи:Нағи NP-ANT-M; ! "Nağıy" (Arabic)
Рәзия:Рәзия NP-ANT-F; ! "Räzıya" (Arabic)
Үмбетәлі:Үмбетәлі NP-ANT-M; ! "Ümbetäli" (Arabic)
Шырынгүл:Шырынгүл NP-ANT-F; ! "Shırıngül" (Arabic)
Васильевич:Василье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Иванович:Ивано NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Павлович:Павло NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Сергеевич:Сергее NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Толстой:Толстой NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Генко:Генко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Жовтис:Жовтис%{☭%} NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Лавриненко:Лавриненко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Николаенко:Николаенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Шекспир:Шекспир NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Беловощев:Беловощев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Есмамбетов:Есмамбетов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Ильин:Ильин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Кошелев:Кошелев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Лапин:Лапин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Молотов:Молотов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мусин:Мусин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Сорокин:Сорокин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Уалиева:Уалиева NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Щукин:Щукин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Freedom% House:Freedom% House NP-ORG ; ! ""
Kazakhmys:Kazakhmys NP-ORG ; ! ""
Ақтөбемұнайгаз:Ақтөбемұнайгаз NP-ORG ; ! ""
Голос% Америки:Голос% Америки NP-ORG ; ! ""
Этнодизайн:Этнодизайн NP-ORG ; ! ""
Petroleum:Petroleum NP-AL ; ! ""
Взгляд:Взгляд NP-AL ; ! ""
Заря:Заря NP-AL ; ! ""
Мир:Мир NP-AL ; ! ""
Тәурат:Тәурат NP-AL ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
қайдан:қайдан ADVITG ; ! ""
қалай:қалай ADVITG ; ! "how"
қашан:қашан ADVITG ; ! "when"
неғұрлым:неғұрлым ADVITG ; ! ""
қаншалықты:қаншалықты ADVITG ; ! ""
әдейі:әдейі ADV ; ! ""
бірен%-саран:бірен%-саран ADV ; ! ""
жазбаша:жазбаша ADV ; ! ""
қайтадан:қайтадан ADV ; ! "once again"
дер:дер ADV ; ! ""
бағана:бағана ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "just now > the one just now" FIXME: gloss
бүгін:бүгін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "today > today's"   FIXME: takes abl, dat, ...
ежел:ежел ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "ancient"
кейін:кейін ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "after"   FIXME: takes comparative
қазір:қазір ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "now > the one now"
бері:бер ADV-WITH-KI-I ; ! "on the near side"
башқұртша:башқұртша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
грекше:грекше ADV-LANG ; ! "Greek"
қытайша:қытайша ADV-LANG ; ! "Chinese"
парсыша:парсыша ADV-LANG ; ! "Persian"
чехше:чехше ADV-LANG ; ! "Czech"
